North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-35 Legislative Management

54-35-01.
Legislative management — Created — Members — Vacancy — Terms.

The North Dakota legislative management consists of the majority and minority leaders of the house and of the senate, the speaker of the house, and six senators and six representatives chosen biennially before the close of each regular legislative session.

In the house of representatives the majority leader shall appoint to the legislative management members elected by the political party with the largest number of members in the house and the minority leader of the house shall appoint to the legislative management members elected by the political party with the next largest number of members in the house. The majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives shall make the appointments so as to give the two political parties having the most members in the house the same total proportionate representation on the legislative management as prevails in the house. In allocating the membership on the legislative management to each political party, the total number of members in the house of representatives must be divided by six; the resulting quotient must then be divided into the number of members of each of the two political parties of the house; the resulting quotient for each party of the house, rounded to the nearest whole number, is the number of members of that political party in the house to be on the legislative management. Notwithstanding this allocation, the minority political party in the house of representatives must be represented by at least two members on the legislative management.

In the senate the majority leader shall appoint to the legislative management members elected by the political party with the largest number of members in the senate and the minority leader shall appoint to the legislative management members elected by the political party with the next largest number of members in the senate. The majority and minority leaders of the senate shall make the appointments so as to give the two political parties having the most members in the senate the same total proportionate representation on the legislative management as prevails in the senate. In allocating the membership on the legislative management to each political party, the total number of members in the senate must be divided by six; the resulting quotient must then be divided into the number of members of each of the two political parties of the senate; the resulting quotient for each party of the senate, rounded to the nearest whole number, is the number of members of that political party in the senate to be on the legislative management. Notwithstanding this allocation, the minority political party in the senate must be represented by at least two members on the legislative management.

Any vacancy occurring when the legislative assembly is not in session must be filled by the selection of another member of the legislative assembly belonging to the same party as the member originally appointed, the selection to be made by the remaining senate or house members of the legislative management, depending upon which body has the vacancy. Each senator and each representative chosen to serve on the legislative management shall serve until a new legislative management has been selected at the next regular legislative session; provided, however, that no senator, not a holdover, who is not re-elected to the senate, and no representative, who is not re-elected to the house of representatives, may serve as a member of the legislative management beyond the closing day of the term to which elected. Any vacancy occurring because any member of the legislative management is not re-elected must be filled for the period from the beginning of the session until a new legislative management is selected, in the same manner as the original legislative management is selected.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 1; 1947, ch. 324, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3501; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 135; 1991, ch. 598, § 1; 1999, ch. 463, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 48; 2011, ch. 410, § 1; 2017, ch. 385, § 1, effective April 10, 2017.

Note.

Section 97 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 provides: “The legislative council may replace ‘chairman of the legislative council’ or ‘legislative council chairman’ with ‘chairman of the legislative management’ in North Dakota Century Code sections 4-05.1-16, 4-35-30, 14-09-09.7, 15-10.2-02, 15-52-03, 15.1-27-41, 16.1-13-10, 20.1-16-02, 24-02-37.2, 27-05.2-09, 44-02-02, 53-12.1-04, 54-03-20, 54-06-25, 54-35-20, 54-35-24, 54-61-01, and 57-39.4-31 and in any other provisions of the code.”

Section 98 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 provides: “The legislative council may replace “budget section of the legislative council” with “budget section of the legislative management” in

North Dakota Century Code sections 15-03-04,

15-10-12.1,

15-69-02,

15-69-05,

17-02-01,

20.1-02-05.1,

25-04-02.2,

40-23-22.1,

40-63-07,

47-30.1-24.1,

48-01.2-25,

50-06-05.1,

54-14-03.1,

54-16-04,

54-16-04.1,

54-16-04.2,

54-16-09,

54-23.3-09,

54-27-22,

54-27-23,

54-27.2-03,

54-44-04,

54-44-16,

54-44.1-13.1,

54-59-05,

57-38-01.29, 57-38-01.30, 64-04-03.1, and 65-08.1-02 and in any other provisions of the code.”

54-35-02.
Powers and duties.

In addition to the other applicable provisions of this chapter, the legislative management has the following powers and duties:

To study, consider, accumulate, compile, and assemble information on any subject upon which the legislative assembly may legislate, and upon such subjects as the legislative assembly may by concurrent or joint resolution authorize or direct, or any subject requested by a member of the legislative assembly; provided, that the legislative management may screen and prioritize studies assigned by concurrent or joint resolution to maintain its workload within the limitations of time and legislative appropriations.

To collect information concerning the government and general welfare of the state and of its political subdivisions.

To study and consider important issues of public policy and questions of general interest.

To study and promote uniformity of legislation in the United States upon subjects upon which uniformity is desirable and to receive, review, and make recommendations on uniform and model laws recommended to it by the state commission on uniform state laws.

To prepare proposed bills and resolutions for consideration of the succeeding legislative assembly.

To call to its assistance other members of the legislative assembly, and it may create committees consisting of its own members, or one or more of its own members and one or more other members of the legislative assembly and delegate by written resolution to such committees such of its powers and rights as it may deem advisable. Committees of the legislative management may also include nonlegislator members. Any member of the legislative assembly has the right to attend any meeting of the legislative management and may present that member’s views on any subject which the legislative management may at any particular time be considering.

To issue subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum in the manner provided in sections 54-03.2-08 and 54-03.2-09. Committees of the legislative management may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum in the same manner if specifically authorized by the legislative management. Failure to obey a subpoena issued by the legislative management, or one of its committees, is contempt.

To control the use of the legislative chambers and permanent displays in memorial hallway. Guidelines may be established pursuant to this subsection and the legislative council shall administer any guidelines that are established.

To determine access to legislative information services and impose fees for providing legislative information services and copies of legislative documents. This authority may not be exercised in a manner that contravenes access to legislative documents as otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3502; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 2; 1973, ch. 410, § 5; 1979, ch. 556, § 1; 1981, ch. 529, § 2; 1985, ch. 576, § 1; 1991, ch. 483, § 2; 1993, ch. 89, § 31; 2009, ch. 482, §
49.

Cross-References.

Arrangement, correction and publication of laws, see N.D.C.C. §§ 46-03-10, 46-03-11, 46-03-15.

Constitutional amendments, reconciliation of conflicting proposals, see N.D.C.C. § 1-02-09.2.

54-35-02.1.
Legislative audit and fiscal review committee.

For the purposes of studying and reviewing the financial transactions of this state; to assure the collection and expenditure of its revenues and moneys in compliance with law and legislative intent and sound financial practices; and to provide the legislative assembly with formal, objective information on revenue collections and expenditures for a basis of legislative action to improve the fiscal structure and transactions of this state, the legislative management shall appoint the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. The members of the committee must be appointed in the same manner as other members of interim committees of the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 427, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 136; 1997, ch. 455, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 50.

54-35-02.2.
Powers and duties of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee.

The legislative audit and fiscal review committee shall study and review audit reports as selected by the committee from those submitted by the state auditor, confer with the auditor and deputy auditors in regard to such reports, and when necessary, confer with representatives of the department, agency, or institution audited in order to obtain full and complete information in regard to any and all fiscal transactions and governmental operations of any department, agency, or institution of the state. The committee shall meet at least once each calendar quarter during each interim. Each department, agency, or institution shall furnish to the committee such aid, information, and assistance in regard to fiscal transactions and governmental operations as it may from time to time request. Whenever the committee may determine or have reason to believe that there may have been a violation of law relating to the receipt, custody, or expenditure of public funds by any state officer or employee, the committee shall present such evidence or information as may be in its possession to the attorney general. The attorney general shall receive and accept such evidence or information and shall immediately commence such additional investigation as the attorney general determines necessary. Upon completion of the investigation, if the evidence supplied by the committee and through the investigation indicates the probability of a violation of law by any state official or employee, the attorney general immediately shall prosecute such official or employee as provided by law. Whenever the committee may determine that a state agency, department, or institution has failed to correct an audit finding within two bienniums which the committee determines critically important, the committee may recommend the legislative assembly reduce the state agency, department, or institution’s appropriation as compared with the amount appropriated to the agency, department, or institution for the previous biennium. The legislative management, through its committee on legislative audit and fiscal review, or such persons as may be directed or employed by the legislative council, is authorized, within the limits of legislative appropriations, to make such audits, examinations, or studies of the fiscal transactions or governmental operations of departments, agencies, or institutions of the state as the legislative management may determine necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 427, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 51; 2017, ch. 392, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 395, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Assistance by legislative budget analyst and auditor, see N.D.C.C. § 54-35-14.

54-35-02.3.
Employee benefits programs committee — Appointment — Selection of chairman.

The legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint an employee benefits programs committee in the same manner as the legislative management appoints other interim committees. The legislative management shall appoint seven members of the house of representatives and six members of the senate to the committee. The legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the statutes and procedure governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 494, § 1; 1991, ch. 599, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 52; 2011, ch. 41, § 30.

54-35-02.4.
Employee benefits programs committee — Powers and duties.

The employee benefits programs committee shall consider and report on those legislative measures and proposals over which it takes jurisdiction and which affect, actuarially or otherwise, the retirement programs of state employees or employees of any political subdivision, and health and retiree health plans of state employees or employees of any political subdivision. The committee shall make a thorough review of any measure or proposal which it takes under its jurisdiction, including an actuarial review. The committee shall take jurisdiction over any measure or proposal that authorizes an automatic increase or other change in benefits beyond the ensuing biennium which would not require legislative approval. The committee must include in the report of the committee a statement that the proposal would allow future changes without legislative involvement. The committee shall report its findings and recommendations, along with any necessary legislation, to the legislative management and to the legislative assembly.

To carry out its responsibilities, the committee, or its designee, may:

Enter contracts, including retainer agreements, with an actuary or actuarial firm for expert assistance and consultation. Each retirement, insurance, or retiree insurance program shall pay, from its retirement, insurance, or retiree health benefits fund, as appropriate, and without the need for a prior appropriation, the cost of any actuarial report required by the committee which relates to that program.

Call on personnel from state agencies or political subdivisions to furnish such information and render such assistance as the committee may from time to time request.

Establish rules for its operation, including the submission and review of proposals and the establishing of standards for actuarial review.

The committee may solicit draft measures and proposals from interested persons during the interim between legislative sessions, and may also study measures and proposals referred to it by the legislative assembly or the legislative management.

A copy of the committee’s report concerning any legislative measure shall, if that measure is introduced for consideration by a legislative assembly, be appended to the copy of that measure which is referred to a standing committee.

A legislative measure affecting a public employees retirement program, public employees health insurance program, or public employee retiree health insurance program may not be introduced in either house unless it is accompanied by a report from the committee. A majority of the members of the committee, acting through the chairman, has sole authority to determine whether any legislative measure affects a program.

Any amendment made during a legislative session to a legislative measure affecting a public employees retirement program, public employees health insurance program, or public employee retiree health insurance program may not be considered by a standing committee unless it is accompanied by a report from the employee benefits programs committee.

Any legislation enacted in contravention of this section is invalid and of no force and effect, and any benefits provided under such legislation must be reduced to the level current prior to enactment.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 494, § 2; 1981, ch. 530, § 1; 1987, ch. 641, § 1; 1991, ch. 599, § 2; 1999, ch. 464, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 53.

54-35-02.5.
Administrative rules committee.

The legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint an administrative rules committee in the same manner as the legislative management appoints other interim committees. The legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the statutes and procedure governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees. The membership of the administrative rules committee must include at least one of the members who served during the most recently completed regular session of the legislative assembly from each of the standing committees of either the house of representatives or the senate.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 557, § 1; 1991, ch. 600, § 10; 1997, ch. 456, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 54.

54-35-02.6.
Rules reviewed by administrative rules committee — Committee responsibility.

The administrative rules committee shall review administrative rules adopted under chapter 28-32. The committee shall consider oral and written comments received concerning administrative rules. The committee shall study and review administrative rules and related statutes to determine whether:

Administrative agencies are properly implementing legislative purpose and intent.

There is dissatisfaction with administrative rules or with statutes relating to administrative rules.

There are unclear or ambiguous statutes relating to administrative rules.

The committee may make rule change recommendations to the adopting agency and may make recommendations to the legislative management for the amendment or repeal of statutes relating to administrative rules. The committee’s failure to review proposed rules prior to publication in the North Dakota Administrative Code does not prevent rules from taking effect. Except for action pursuant to section 28-32-17 or 28-32-18, the recommendations or opinions of the committee do not affect the legality of any rule as determined by the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 557, § 2; 1981, ch. 343, § 3; 1995, ch. 517, § 1; 2001, ch. 293, § 29; 2009, ch. 482, § 55.

54-35-02.7.
Water topics overview committee — Duties.

The legislative management, during each interim, shall appoint a water topics overview committee in the same manner as the legislative management appoints other interim committees. The committee must meet quarterly and is responsible for legislative overview of water topics and related matters, the Garrison diversion project, and for any necessary discussions with adjacent states on water topics. The committee shall work collaboratively with the state water commission and may meet with the state water commission. The committee shall report on the committee’s project prioritization process, provide updates on allocated program expenditures, and report on the fund balances of projects, grants, and contracts. The legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the statutes and procedure governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 531, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 137; 1987, ch. 642, § 1; 2003, ch. 479, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
56; 2009, ch. 502, § 1; 2011, ch. 496, § 1; 2013, ch. 20, § 17; 2013, ch. 486, § 1; 2013, ch. 490, § 3; 2015, ch. 54, § 31, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 384, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 31 of chapter 54, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 384, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 20, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 486, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 490, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-35-02.7 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 31 of Chapter 54, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2020; and Section 1 of Chapter 384, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1061.

Section 54-35-02.7 was amended 3 times by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 17 of chapter 20, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1020; section 1 of chapter 486, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2049; and section 3 of chapter 490, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2233.

One of the 2013 amendments to this section was to remove the expiration date of November 30, 2013.

Section 2 of chapter 502, S.L. 2009 provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act is effective through November 30, 2013, and after that date is ineffective.”

Cross-References.

Garrison diversion conservancy district, see N.D.C.C. ch. 61-24.

54-35-02.8.
Legislative ethics committee.

The legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint an ethics committee to consider or prepare a legislative code of ethics. The committee must include members of the majority and minority parties of each house. The committee may recommend legislation relating to legislative ethics. The committee shall operate according to the laws and procedures governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 518, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 57; 2017, ch. 391, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

54-35-02.9.
Budget section — Appointment — Powers and duties.

To provide for flexibility in the management of state funds between regular sessions of the legislative assembly and to minimize the need for and the expense of a special session, the legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint a budget section.

The membership of the budget section must include:

The majority leader and the assistant majority leader of the house of representatives;

The majority leader and the assistant majority leader of the senate;

The minority leader and the assistant minority leader of the house of representatives;

The minority leader and the assistant minority leader of the senate;

The speaker of the house of representatives; and

Each member of the legislative assembly appointed to serve on the appropriations committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

The legislative management shall designate the chairman of the budget section. The budget section shall operate according to the statutes and procedures governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees. The budget section shall meet at least quarterly upon the call of the chairman.

The legislative assembly, by law, may provide the authority for the budget section to approve specific actions, projects, and transfers.

When evaluating state agency requests, the budget section shall consider criteria applicable to the request, including whether:

The request is for a specific purpose;

The request is for a specific amount of funds and for a specific time frame, not to continue beyond the end of the current biennium;

The request conforms with legislative intent;

The request is consistent with related statutory provisions;

The request supports state priorities;

The request improves state efficiencies and promotes effective state government;

If the request is for a new program, the program does not extend beyond the current biennium; and

The request addresses a state emergency.

The budget section shall gather documentation that addresses each of the applicable criterion included in subdivision a from the agency requesting budget section approval.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 438, § 15, effective August 1, 2019.

54-35-02.10.
Legislative audit and fiscal review committee — Auditing guidelines.

Each biennium, the legislative audit and fiscal review committee, in consultation with the state auditor, shall review updates to government auditing standards and develop guidelines for the contents of state agency audit reports. The legislative audit and fiscal review committee shall consider the following when developing the guidelines:

Applicable auditing standards;

Sound financial practices;

Compliance with laws and legislative intent;

Data analyses; and

The opportunity to improve the efficient and effective operations of state agencies.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

54-35-03.
State departments, officers, and employees to cooperate.

Each department, board, commission, agency, officer, or employee in the state government shall furnish such information and render such assistance to the legislative council and to the legislative management as the legislative council or the legislative management or its committees may from time to time request.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3503; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 58.

54-35-04.
Meetings — When held — How called — Quorum.

The legislative management or committee appointed by it, may sit at such time and place as it may deem advisable, but the legislative management shall meet at least once in each year and shall meet at any time upon the call of the chairman or a call signed by seven members of the legislative management. At any meeting of the legislative management, seven members constitute a quorum and a majority of such quorum has the authority to act in any matter falling within the jurisdiction of the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3504; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 4; 2009, ch. 482, § 59.

54-35-05.
Governor sending messages to meetings.

The governor may send messages to such meetings of the legislative management as the governor determines advisable.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3505; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 5; 2009, ch. 482, § 60.

54-35-06.
Officers — Accept funds — Expenditures.

The legislative management shall select a chairman and a vice chairman from its own members and may prescribe its own rules of procedure. The legislative management may appoint a secretary who need not be a member, and shall appoint a director who must be in charge of the legislative council and who must be paid such salary as the legislative management may determine. The director may employ such persons and obtain the assistance of such research agencies as determined necessary. The director may use available funds for salary adjustments to assist with staff recruitment, retention, and recognition of exceptional performance. The legislative management and the legislative council may accept and use any funds made available through the terms of any agreement made with any agency whatsoever for the accomplishment of the purpose of this chapter. Expenditures of funds made available by legislative appropriation must be made in accordance with rules or motions duly approved by the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3506; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 6; 2009, ch. 482, § 61; 2015, ch. 1, § 8, effective April 27, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015 became effective April 27, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 13 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015.

54-35-07.
Records — Reports.

The legislative management shall keep minutes of its meetings and a record of all its transactions and shall at the beginning of each biennial legislative session, and may at any other time, make a report of its activities and recommendations to the members of the legislative assembly and to the governor.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3507; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 7; 2009, ch. 482, § 62.

54-35-08.
Recommended legislation may be required in advance.

The legislative management may require that any recommendation for legislation, which is to be presented by any department, board, commission, agency, officer, official, or employee of the state desiring the consideration of the legislative management, be presented to it at least sixty days in advance of any regular legislative session.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3508; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 8; 2009, ch. 482, § 63.

54-35-09.
Recommendations — When made public — Distribution.

The recommendations of the legislative management must be completed and made public prior to any session of the legislative assembly at which such recommendations are to be submitted; and a copy of the recommendations must be distributed to each member-elect of the legislative assembly, to each elective state officer, and to the state law library.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3509; S.L. 1969, ch. 448, § 9; 2009, ch. 482, § 64.

54-35-10.
Compensation of members and leadership.

The members of the legislative management and the members of any committee of the legislative management are entitled to be compensated for the time spent in attendance at sessions of the legislative management and of its committees at the rate of one hundred eighty-nine dollars through June 30, 2022, and one hundred ninety-three dollars thereafter per day and must also be paid for expenses incurred in attending said meetings and in the performance of their official duties in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

In addition to the compensation provided in subsection 1, the chairman of the legislative management is entitled to receive an additional five dollars for each day spent in attendance at sessions of the legislative management and of its committees, and the chairman of each of the legislative management’s committees is entitled to receive five dollars for each day spent in attendance at sessions of the legislative management or of the committee which the person chairs.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 289, § 10; 1949, ch. 323, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3510; S.L. 1967, ch. 391, § 1; 1969, ch. 448, § 10; 1969, ch. 449, § 1; 1971, ch. 487, § 4; 1975, ch. 481, § 1; 1979, ch. 536, § 2; 1981, ch. 520, § 2; 1985, ch. 558, § 3; 1999, ch. 465, § 1; 2001, ch. 490, § 1; 2007, ch. 453, §§ 5, 6; 2007, ch. 1, § 11; 2009, ch. 386, §§ 8, 9; 2009, ch. 482, § 65; 2011, ch. 1, §§ 10, 11; 2013, ch. 32, §§ 8, 9; 2015, ch. 1, § 9, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 1, § 10, effective July 1, 2016; 2019, ch. 1, § 9, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 1, § 10, effective July 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 29, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 13 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 10 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015 becomes effective July 1, 2016, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 13 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 32, S.L. 2013 becomes effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 32, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-35-10 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 10 of Chapter 1, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1001; and Section 9 of Chapter 1, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1001.

Section 54-35-10 was amended 2 times by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 8 of chapter 32, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2001; and section 9 of chapter 32, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2001.

54-35-11.
Preparation for and assistance to legislative assembly — Custody of equipment — Approval of delayed vouchers.

The legislative council, on behalf of the legislative assembly, may make all necessary arrangements before each legislative session for the procurement of necessary supplies, equipment, services other than the employment of legislative employees, building space, or any other preparations or arrangements the legislative council determines necessary or desirable to be made before the commencement of each legislative session in order to facilitate the proper convening and operation of the legislative assembly. The legislative council shall act as the custodial agency to ensure the proper storage and safekeeping of legislative supplies and equipment during the interim periods between legislative sessions, and may approve vouchers on behalf of the legislative assembly for the payment from legislative appropriations of delayed billings or other billings for legislative expenses during periods when the legislative assembly is not in session. The legislative council shall carry out such duties or projects and provide such service and assistance to the legislative assembly or its committees, the legislative management or its committees, and members of the legislative assembly as may be requested by concurrent resolution of the legislative assembly or determined necessary or desirable in assisting the legislative assembly or the legislative management in meeting its responsibilities and carrying out its duties during the legislative session or the interim between sessions.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 356, § 1; 1969, ch. 448, § 11; 2009, ch. 482, § 66.

54-35-12.
Legislative budget analyst and auditor.

The legislative management shall appoint a legislative budget analyst and auditor. A person is not eligible for the appointment unless the person holds a baccalaureate degree from a recognized institution of higher learning, is a certified public accountant, or has had five years’ experience in government accounting. The appointment of the legislative auditor must be based upon qualifications of eligible persons without reference to partisan politics. The salary of the legislative budget analyst and auditor must be determined by the legislative council and it may employ additional persons as necessary to carry out sections 54-35-12 through 54-35-14.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 357, § 1; 1969, ch. 448, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 67.

54-35-13.
Personnel — Compensation — Expenses.

The salaries, travel, and other expenses of the legislative budget analyst and auditor and other personnel within the legislative budget analyst and auditor’s office must be submitted, approved, and paid in the same manner as other employees of the legislative council.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 357, § 2; 1969, ch. 448, § 13.

54-35-14.
Powers and duties of legislative budget analyst and auditor.

The legislative budget analyst and auditor shall attend all budget hearings carried on by the executive budget officer and shall have access to all budget material submitted to, and all studies carried on by, the executive budget officer. The legislative budget analyst and auditor shall analyze the executive budget when prepared, with special reference to sources of revenue, trends in governmental spending and finance, policies followed and inconsistencies in such policies, and proposed new or substantially expanded or reduced areas of spending and prepare a report of that analysis for the legislative assembly. The legislative budget analyst and auditor shall report thereon to the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives in joint meeting and shall perform such services for such committees during the legislative session as they shall reasonably request. The legislative audit and fiscal review committee may call upon the legislative budget analyst and auditor for such assistance as it may deem necessary in the analysis of any audit submitted to such committee. Each department, institution, and agency shall furnish such records and information to the legislative budget analyst and auditor as requested by the legislative budget analyst and auditor in the performance of official duties.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 357, § 3; 1969, ch. 448, § 14.

54-35-15.
Information technology program — Staff — Powers and duties.

The legislative council shall provide information technology research and staff services to the legislative branch. The services must be provided in accordance with the existing statutory authority of the legislative council and within the framework of its other staff services.

The legislative council shall provide information technology services, may hire such staff as are necessary, and set compensation for any additional staff within the limits of legislative appropriations.

The legislative council shall structure the provision of information technology services and assistance to the legislative assembly and shall receive such cooperation and assistance from other state agencies as the council reasonably may request.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 532, § 1; 1997, ch. 457, § 5; 1999, ch. 483, § 21; 2009, ch. 482, §
68.

54-35-15.1.
Information technology committee — Appointment.

The legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint an information technology committee in the same manner as the legislative management appoints other interim committees. The legislative management shall appoint six members of the house of representatives and five members of the senate to the committee. The chief information officer of the state is an ex officio, nonvoting member of the committee. The legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the statutes and procedure governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 466, § 1; 2003, ch. 503, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 69.